Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-206
Debts of wife contracted before marriage; husband not liable.

The property of the husband shall not be liable for any debts contracted by the wife before marriage.

Laws 1877, § 1, p. 33;

R.S.1913, § 1565;

C.S.1922, § 1514;

C.S.1929, § 42-206;

R.S.1943, § 42-206.

Husband, separated from wife and paying temporary alimony, is not liable for necessaries furnished wife. Wise Memorial Hospital Assn. v. Peyton, 99 Neb. 48, 154 N.W. 838 (1915).